Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 2. Fund Administration

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Unemployment Compensation § 7.

81 C.J.S. Social Security and Public Welfare §§ 467 to 474.

§ 27-3-201.
Establishment and composition of unemployment compensation fund.

The unemployment compensation fund is established and shall be administered by the department for purposes of this act.

The fund shall consist of:

Contributions collected under this act, excluding revenues for the employment support fund under W.S. 27-3-505(a);

Funds received under 42 U.S.C. § 1321;

Interest earned on the fund balance;

Any property or securities acquired by the fund and any earnings of the acquired property or securities;

Any other funds received for the fund from any other source; and

Funds credited to Wyoming’s account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1103.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 9; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 13, 14; 1941, ch. 96, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-109; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-31; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-111; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 168, § 2; 1999, ch. 159, § 2; 2003, ch. 123, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to definition of “contribution” with reference to unemployment compensation fund and as to definition of “fund,” see §

27-3-102

.

As to social security, see §

9-3-301

et seq.

As to depository provisions, see article 8 of chapter 4 of title 9.

As to authorized investments for public funds, see §

9-4-831

.

The 2003 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, deleted “any special reserve contribution rate imposed under W.S. 27-3-503(g) and” preceding “revenues” in (b)(i).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-202.
Administration of fund.

The department is the custodian of the fund and shall administer the fund and issue warrants upon the fund in accordance with the directions of the department or regulations of the commission. The state treasurer shall maintain a clearing account, an unemployment trust fund account and a benefit account separately within the fund as specified by the department.

All funds payable to the fund shall be deposited by the department or its authorized representative in the clearing account, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer. In addition, all funds collected from the employment support fund under W.S. 27-3-505(a) shall be deposited by the department in the clearing account, for clearance only, and shall not become a part of the fund. After clearance, funds collected for the employment support fund under W.S. 27-3-505(a) shall be deposited in the employment support fund created by W.S.

27-3-211

. Thereafter, refunds payable pursuant to W.S.

27-3-515

may be paid from the clearing account upon warrants issued by the state auditor under regulation of the commission. Remaining funds in the clearing account shall be immediately deposited with the United States secretary of the treasury in Wyoming’s account within the unemployment trust fund established pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1104(e).

The benefit account consists of all funds withdrawn from Wyoming’s account in the unemployment trust fund. Funds shall be withdrawn from Wyoming’s account only for the payment of benefits in accordance with regulations of the commission, except as provided by W.S.

27-3-204

. The department shall withdraw funds from the unemployment trust fund in amounts necessary to pay benefits for a reasonable future period. Withdrawals from the unemployment trust fund shall not exceed the balance of Wyoming’s account within the trust fund. Upon receipt, the department shall deposit the funds in the benefit account, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer, and shall issue warrants for the payment of benefits from the benefit account. Any funds remaining unclaimed or unpaid in the benefit account after the expiration of the period for which they were withdrawn shall be deducted from estimates and used for the payment of benefits during succeeding periods or deposited with the United States secretary of the treasury in Wyoming’s account in the unemployment trust fund.

Except as otherwise provided by this act, the department may deposit funds of the clearing and benefit accounts, under regulation of the commission and separate from other state funds, in an approved public depository in the manner provided by W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-815

. Any collateral pledged for this purpose shall be separate from collateral pledged to secure other state funds. All funds recovered from losses sustained by the fund shall be deposited into the fund. The department may request an examination of any return or report of a national banking association required by this act pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 3305(c).

Warrants for payment of benefits and refunds from the benefit and clearing accounts shall be signed by the state auditor and the department or its authorized agent.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 9; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 13, 14; 1941, ch. 96, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-109; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-31; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-111; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 168, § 2; 1999, ch. 159, § 2; 2003, ch. 123, § 2; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2003 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, in (b), deleted “special reserve contribution rate imposed under W.S. 27-3-503(g) and from the” preceding “employment support fund” in the second sentence, and deleted the third sentence, pertaining to deposit of funds into the state unemployment insurance trust fund.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “department” for “state treasurer” in (a) and (d); in the second sentence in (a), substituted “The state treasurer” for “He” and added “as specified by the department”;
in (b), deleted “with the state treasurer” following “representative” and added “with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer” and made a related change in the first sentence, and substituted “state auditor” for treasurer in the second sentence; in the third sentence in (c), substituted “department” for “treasurer” and inserted “with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer” and made a related change; deleted “by the treasurer” following “deposited” in the third sentence; and substituted “state auditor” for “treasurer” in (e).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Severability. —

Section 20, ch. 113, Laws 1937, reads: “If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstances, is held invalid, the remainder of this act, and the application of such provisions to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.”

Cited

in

Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Secrest, 811 P.2d 733,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 27-3-203.
Discontinuance or nonmaintenance of fund; disposition of assets.

If the unemployment trust fund is discontinued or Wyoming’s account is no longer maintained, the provisions of W.S.

27-3-201

and

27-3-202

relating to the unemployment trust fund are no longer effective. All funds, properties or securities of the Wyoming unemployment compensation fund shall be transferred to the state treasurer. The treasurer shall hold, invest, transfer, sell, deposit and release the funds, properties or securities in a manner approved by the commission in accordance with law and this act [§§

27-3-101

through

27-3-704

]. Any investment shall allow sufficient conversion of fund assets for payment of benefits.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 9; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 13, 14; 1941, ch. 96, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-109; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-31; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-111; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-204.
Withdrawal funds credited to federal unemployment trust fund.

Funds credited to Wyoming’s account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1103 may be withdrawn only for the payment of benefits and expenses for the administration of this act pursuant to this section except as provided by W.S.

27-3-208

and for the payment of expenses for the administration of public employment offices administered by the department of workforce services pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2601(e).

Funds shall be withdrawn for administrative expenses by legislative appropriation. The appropriation shall:

Specify the amounts and purposes for which the funds are appropriated;

Limit the period in which the funds may be obligated to not more than two (2) years after the date of enactment; and

Limit the amount which may be obligated to an amount which does not exceed the amount by which the amounts transferred to Wyoming’s account pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1103 exceed the aggregate of the amounts used by Wyoming pursuant to this act and charged against the amounts transferred to Wyoming’s account.

Funds withdrawn for payment of administrative expenses pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the employment security administration account and shall remain a part of the unemployment fund until spent. The department shall maintain a separate record of the deposit, obligation, expenditure and return of funds deposited. Any funds deposited and not spent for purposes specified within the legislative appropriation or remaining at the expiration of the period specified by the appropriation shall be deposited with the United States secretary of the treasury in Wyoming’s account in the unemployment trust fund.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 9; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 13, 14; 1941, ch. 96, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-109; Laws 1957, ch. 88, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-31; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-111; Laws 1981, ch. 110, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1992, ch. 11, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-205.
Employment security administration account.

The employment security administration account is established and shall be administered by the department. The department, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer, may deposit funds within the account separate from other state funds in an approved public depository in accordance with W.S.

9-4-801

through

9-4-815

. Funds deposited into the account are available to the department for expenditure in accordance with this act and shall not be transferred to any other account. Account expenditures, except funds received pursuant to W.S.

27-3-204

, shall be only for the payment of necessary administrative expenses of this act as determined by the United States secretary of labor and for the establishment and maintenance of public employment offices pursuant to W.S. 9-2-2601(e). All funds deposited into the account pursuant to W.S.

27-3-204

shall remain a part of the unemployment compensation fund and shall be used in accordance with W.S. 27-3-204.

The account shall consist of:

Funds appropriated by the legislature, funds received under 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq. and other federal funds and funds received from any other source for purposes specified in this section;

Federal funds and funds from any other state received as compensation for services or facilities supplied from the account;

Funds from any surety bond, insurance policy or other source for losses sustained by the account including damage to equipment or supplies purchased by the account; and

Any proceeds from the sale or disposition of equipment or supplies purchased by the account.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 13; 1939, ch. 124, § 17; 1941, ch. 96, § 12; 1943, ch. 58, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-113; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 12; 1957, ch. 88, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 27-35; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-115; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to deposits and depositories generally, see §

9-4-801

et seq.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a), substituted “department” for “state treasurer” in the first sentence and inserted “department, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state” in the second sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 27-3-206.
Replacement of certain funds; how implemented; reports.

The state shall replace any federal funds received under 42 U.S.C. § 501 et seq., any funds granted to the state under 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq. and any funds of the state or any political subdivision which are matched by federal funds under 29 U.S.C. § 49 et seq. and found by the federal government to be lost or spent for purposes other than or in amounts in excess of those amounts necessary for the administration of this act. Replacement of funds pursuant to this section shall be by legislative appropriation from the state general fund to the employment security administration account for expenditure as provided by W.S.

27-3-205

. The department shall report to the governor and the governor to the legislature through the report required under W.S.

9-2-1014

the amount required for the replacement.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 13; 1939, ch. 124, § 17; 1941, ch. 96, § 12; 1943, ch. 58, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-113; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 12; 1957, ch. 88, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 27-35; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-115; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 31, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-207.
Employment security revenue account.

The employment security revenue account is created as a separate account in the employment security administration account. Monies within the account may only be expended by legislative appropriation. The account shall be used:

To replace any funds pursuant to W.S.

27-3-206

;

For necessary expenses of this act for which no federal funds are available provided the expenditures from the account are not substituted for federal funds which would otherwise be available; and

Instead of federal funds requested but not received provided the account is reimbursed upon receipt of requested federal funds.

Notwithstanding W.S.

27-3-201

,

27-3-202

and

27-3-205

, the employment security revenue account shall consist of:

Interest collected under W.S. 27-3-510(a) and deposited in the clearing account, provided a sufficient balance is kept within the clearing account to pay interest refunds; and

All federal funds accruing to the Wyoming unemployment trust fund with the United States secretary of the treasury under 26 U.S.C. § 3301 et seq. which are for administrative purposes.

Funds deposited in the Wyoming unemployment trust fund pursuant to paragraph (b)(ii) of this section may be withdrawn according to procedures established by the United States secretary of the treasury.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 13; 1939, ch. 124, § 17; 1941, ch. 96, § 12; 1943, ch. 58, § 8; C.S. 1945, § 54-113; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 12; 1957, ch. 88, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 27-35; W.S. 1977, § 27-3-115; Laws 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1987, ch. 238, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 164, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “within the state trust and agency fund” in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 27-3-208.
Advances from federal unemployment trust fund.

The governor may apply for and receive advances to the state of Wyoming from its account in the federal unemployment trust fund and shall be responsible for the advances in accordance with the conditions specified in Title XII [42 U.S.C. § 1321 et seq.] of the “Social Security Act”, as amended, in order to secure to Wyoming the advantages available under that title.

Principal repayments shall only be made from federal revenues credited to or received by Wyoming under this act or interfund borrowing under section 5 of this act [Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5, as amended by Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 2] and repayments of interest, if any, shall only be made from revenues available by a legislative appropriation for that purpose or interfund borrowings under section 5 of this act [Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5, as amended by Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 2].

History.

Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

“Section 5 of this act,” as used in subsection (b), means Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5, as amended by Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 2, which reads:

“Upon periodic certification of inadequate revenues by the governor to the state treasurer, the state treasurer may utilize interfund loans from the budget reserve account created under W.S. 9-2-1012(e) in an amount not to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00) and from the account created under W.S. 9-4-601(b)(ii) in an amount not to exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000.00) to the unemployment compensation fund or account as needed to repay revenues borrowed under W.S.

27-3-208

or to pay benefits payable through February 20, 1985, required under the Wyoming Employment Security Law which cannot be paid due to the insufficiency of any other revenues available to the Employment Security Commission excluding federal revenues under W.S.

27-3-208

. The loans shall bear no interest and shall be repaid at the time and in the manner prescribed by the legislature with the first payment to commence no later than July 1, 1985.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

§ 27-3-209.
State unemployment insurance trust fund established.

There is established the state unemployment insurance trust fund. All state unemployment insurance contributions collected under W.S.

27-3-503

through

27-3-505

, less refunds, shall be deposited into the fund and held in trust for the sole and exclusive use of payment on unemployment insurance benefits. The state treasurer shall invest available revenues in the fund in accordance with law, and earnings from those investments shall be credited to the workforce development training fund established in W.S.

9-2-2604

.

The director may determine when and in what amounts withdrawals from the state unemployment insurance trust fund for payment of benefits are necessary. Amounts withdrawn for payment of benefits shall be immediately forwarded to the secretary of the treasury of the United States of America to the credit of the state’s account in the unemployment trust fund.

If the state unemployment insurance trust fund is dissolved, all money then in that fund, less earnings, shall be immediately transferred to the credit of the state’s account in the unemployment compensation fund, regardless of other provisions of law. Earnings from the state unemployment insurance trust fund shall be credited to the workforce development training fund established in W.S.

9-2-2604

. The governor may dissolve the state unemployment insurance trust fund if he finds it to be unnecessary based upon the solvency of the unemployment compensation fund and need for training for Wyoming workers.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 168, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3.

§ 27-3-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1997, ch. 168, § 1, established the workforce development training fund.

§ 27-3-211.
Employment support fund established.

There is established the employment support fund. Revenues allocated pursuant to W.S. 27-3-505(a) shall be credited to the employment support fund by the department, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer. The state treasurer shall invest available revenues in the fund in accordance with law, and earnings from those investments shall be credited to the fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

and

9-4-207

, the monies in the employment support fund shall not revert.

Monies from the employment support fund shall be expended only upon appropriation by the legislature and shall be withdrawn solely for unemployment compensation benefits or administrative expenses to:

Offset funding deficits for program administration under this act;

Collect and administer the revenues collected under W.S. 27-3-505(a);

Further support programs to strengthen unemployment fund solvency;

Support employment office programs administered by the department of workforce services.

The department shall report annually to the joint appropriations committee and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than September 1 of each year on the status of the employment support fund, detailing fund expenditures and the fund’s current balance.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 159, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 22, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “department, with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the” in the first sentence.

The 2022 amendment,

in the last sentence of (a), added “Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

and

9-4-207

,” deleted “to the general fund at the end of any fiscal year, except that any unappropriated amounts remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall be transferred by the state treasurer to the state unemployment insurance trust fund created pursuant to W.S.

27-3-209

” at the end, made related changes; and added (c).

Laws 2022, ch. 22, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.